Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3873.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
No entity shall sit as a court of the Judicial Branch of the Commonwealth without due
process of law in effect, in accordance with the Articles of the Commonwealth’s Constitution,
including Articles X-XV, XXIX & XXX and the Fifth and Fourteenth Due Process Amendments
of the U.S. Constitution.
Due process shall include any statutorily mandated procedure or established adjudicatory
procedure. Every adjudication is to be resolved by full, fair adjudication of the rights and
defenses of the parties alike through the full panoply of constitutional, substantive and
procedural rights, including: Notice; Answer; Jury Trial; Discovery; Counterclaim; Pretrial and
Other Motions; Equitable Relief; Relief from Judgment; Appeal. A proceeding will be except
from a procedural right to the extent that the legislated subject matter does not provide for Jury
Trial, for instance.
of 2

The specific requirements of any proceeding will comply with relevant statutory law,
promulgated due process rules and any regulations relevant to the subject matter before the court.
Every court shall abide by the applicable statutorily provided subject matter and limitations.
Courts will recognize and enforce any constitutional due process right, whether an established
procedure exists yet or not. No court will enter an order against a person (natural or legally
established entity), unless the court has jurisdiction over them established in accordance with the
requirements for jurisdiction over their persons.
Any attempt to sit as a court or engage in a judicial proceeding failing the above will lack
jurisdiction. Any attempt to proceed in contradiction to constitutional due process guarantees
will be void.
To fulfill its obligation to due process and, thereby, sit as a court, the proceeding must
provide equal justice, neither be “denied nor abridged on the basis of sex, race, color, creed or
national origin” nor on the basis of age or disability, where a reasonable accommodation
liberally interpreted will provide for equal participation, nor on the basis of indigency or the
election to self-represent. All persons shall be provided equal justice as to applicable stare
decisis.
Nor shall any person within the jurisdiction of the court be denied a public hearing,
accessible to the media, nor access to public record documentation unless statutorily,
regulatorily, or jurisprudentially limited specific to the subject matter of the case or a particular
procedure but at all times will have equal access as to other parties.
of 2